Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-730
Retired judge;
temporary duty; compensation.

A retired judge holding court
pursuant to sections 24-729 to 24-733 shall receive, in addition to his or
her retirement benefits, for each day of temporary duty an amount established
by the Supreme Court. In addition,
a retired judge who consents to serve a minimum number of temporary duty days
annually, as established by the Supreme Court, and is appointed by the Supreme
Court for such extended service, may also receive a stipend or an adjusted
stipend calculated from the number of days of temporary duty performed by
the judge in such annual period in relation to an annual base amount established
by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1974, LB 832, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 268, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB727, § 1.